District of Columbia statutes.
31-1315

Grounds for liquidation.

The Commissioner may petition the Superior Court of the District of Columbia for an order directing him or her to liquidate a domestic insurer or an alien insurer domiciled in the District on the basis:

(1)

Of any ground for an order of rehabilitation as specified in § 31-1310, whether or not there has been a prior order directing the rehabilitation of the insurer;

(2)

That the insurer is insolvent; or

(3)

That the insurer is in such a condition that the further transaction of business would be hazardous, financially or otherwise, to its policyholders, its creditors, or the public.

History

Oct. 15, 1993, D.C. Law 10-35, § 16, 40 DCR 5773
May 21, 1997, D.C. Law 11-268, § 10(z)(2), 44 DCR 1730

Cross References

Rehabilitation, liquidation, or conservation of health maintenance organizations, see § 31-3420.

Section References

This section is referenced in § 31-1314, § 31-1349, and § 31-3420.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 35-2815.